Rhode Island statutes. Title 36 Public Officers and Employees
Chapter 16 Termination of Employment Contracts

36-16-1.
State employment contracts — Prohibitions.

No state agency, department of government, commission, board, authority, public corporation, governmental or quasi-governmental body, autonomous or otherwise, which is created by authority of the general assembly, executive order, or state law, shall enter into any contract or agreement with any individual, firm, or partnership which provides for any of the following upon termination of employment:

Termination damages or benefits, including continuation of salary or other compensation for more than six (6) months from the date of termination;

Severance pay, excepting accrued vacation pay, sick leave benefits, or health care benefits, for more than one year from the date of termination;

Mandatory hiring, payment, or compensation for work performed or services rendered as a consultant or in any other capacity following termination; or

Which provides for a contract term in excess of three (3) years.

This section shall not apply to collective bargaining agreements entered into between an employer and a labor organization as defined in §

28-7-3

.

History of Section.

P.L. 1985, ch. 341, § 1.

36-16-2.
Void contracts.

Any contract or other agreement which is made contrary to or in violation of the provisions of §

36-16-1

shall be null and void and have no force or effect.

History of Section.

P.L. 1985, ch. 341, § 1.